Illinois, session 104th, SB1760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5adding Section 10.27 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/10.27 new)7    Sec. 10.27. Training; police chaplains. The Board shall 8develop a program for training unpaid volunteers to serve as 9police chaplains.